Maryland, session 2026, HB1519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Administration” means the Maryland Cannabis Administration established
under this title.
(o) (1) “Control” means:
(i) the decision–making authority over the management,
operations, or policies that guide a business; or
(ii) authority over the operation of the technical aspects of a
business.
(2) “Control” includes:
(i) holding a right to veto significant events;
(ii) the right or authority to make or veto decisions regarding
[operations and strategic planning,] capital allocations, acquisitions, and divestments;
AND
(iii) the right or authority to appoint or remove directors,
corporate–level officers, or their equivalent[;
(iv) the right or authority to make major marketing, production, and
financial decisions; and
(v) the right or authority to execute exclusive contracts or significant
contracts in the aggregate of $10,000 or greater on behalf of the licensee].

HOUSE BILL 1519 3
(3) “CONTROL” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT THAT CONVEYS THE
RIGHT TO OR ACTUAL PAYMENT FROM THE CANNABIS LICENSEE TO THE PROVIDER
OF THE SERVICE IN AN AMOUNT THAT DOES NOT EXCEED, OVER THE COURSE OF A
CALENDAR YEAR, THE GREATER OF:
1. 25% OF THE CANNABIS LICENSEE’S GROSS REVENUE;
OR
2. 50% OF THE CANNABIS LICENSEE’S GROSS PROFIT;
(II) A FRANCHISE RELATIONSHIP SUBJECT TO TITLE 14,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE; OR
(III) AN OPTION TO PURCHASE A CONTROLLING OWNERSHIP
INTEREST IN A CANNABIS LICENSEE THAT IS EXERCISABLE ONLY AFTER THE
EXPIRATION OF THE TRANSFER PROHIBITION IN § 36–503(C) OF THIS TITLE.
(U–1) “MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT” MEANS AN AGREEMENT UNDER
WHICH A CANNABIS LICENSEE CONTRACTS WITH A THIRD PARTY TO RECEIVE:
(1) MANAGERIAL, ADMINISTRATIVE, OPERATIONAL, OR ADVISORY
SERVICES;
(2) FINANCING, INCLUDING EQUITY INVESTMENTS AND
CONVERTIBLE DEBT;
(3) COMMERCIAL REAL PROPERTY; OR
(4) INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY.
(aa) “Ownership interest” means a direct or indirect equity interest in a cannabis
licensee, including in its profits, revenues, shares, or stock.
36–401.
(e) (1) This subsection applies to all licenses, including licenses converted
under subsection (b)(1)(ii) of this section.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, a person may have an
ownership interest in or control of, including the power to manage and operate:
(i) for standard licenses and micro licenses:

HOUSE BILL 1519
1. one grower licensee;
2. one processor licensee; and
3. not more than four dispensary licensees;
(ii) for incubator space licenses, not more than two licensees; and
(iii) for on–site consumption licenses, not more than two licensees.
(3) (i) A person who owns or controls an incubator space licensee or an
on–site consumption licensee may not own or control any cannabis licensee listed under
paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection.
(ii) The Administration [shall adopt regulations limiting] MAY NOT
LIMIT a person or fund from acquiring a nonmajority ownership interest in multiple
cannabis businesses beyond the limitations established under this subsection.
(4) The restrictions in paragraph (2) of this subsection do not apply to:
(I) a person [or an entity who] THAT holds an ownership interest
only as a passive investor; OR
(II) A FRANCHISOR SUBJECT TO TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
36–502.1.
(A) A MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT MAY NOT TAKE EFFECT UNTIL
THE AGREEMENT IS APPROVED BY THE ADMINISTRATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) A CANNABIS LICENSEE SHALL SUBMIT A PROPOSED
MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT TO THE ADMINISTRATION FOR REVIEW AND
APPROVAL.
(2) AS PART OF THE ADMINISTRATION’S REVIEW UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REQUIRE THAT A PARTY TO A
MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT PROVIDE ANY OTHER ADDITIONAL
INFORMATION RELEVANT TO THE AGREEMENT.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL REVIEW THE INFORMATION SUBMITTED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION TO DETERMINE WHETHER

HOUSE BILL 1519 5
THE MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT CONSTITUTES A TRANSFER OF CONTROL
IN VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE.
(D) (1) BASED ON THE ADMINISTRATION’S REVIEW CONDUCTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL APPROVE,
CONDITIONALLY APPROVE, OR DENY THE MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT.
(2) IF THE ADMINISTRATION CONDITIONALLY APPROVES OR DENIES
A MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL INFORM THE
CANNABIS LICENSEE OF THE GROUNDS FOR THE CONDITIONAL APPROVAL OR THE
DENIAL.
(3) THE DETERMINATION OF THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL BE
PROVIDED TO THE CANNABIS LICENSEE IN WRITING.
(4) IF THE ADMINISTRATION DOES NOT MAKE A DETERMINATION
WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE SUBMITTAL OF A MANAGEMENT SERVICES
AGREEMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE MANAGEMENT
SERVICES AGREEMENT SHALL BE DEEMED APPROVED.
(E) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH A
PROCEDURE FOR THE SUBMISSION, REVIEW, AND APPROVAL OF A MANAGEMENT
SERVICES AGREEMENT.
36–503.
(a) A cannabis license granted under this title is not transferable except as
provided in this section.
(b) To transfer ownership or control of a license issued under this title, a licensee:
(1) shall submit to the Administration:
(i) an application fee in an amount to be determined by the
Administration in accordance with this subtitle; and
(ii) an application developed by the Administration; and
(2) must meet the requirements for transfer of ownership or control
established by the Administration under this title.
(c) (1) A cannabis licensee, including a cannabis licensee whose license was
converted in accordance with § 36–401 of this title, may not transfer ownership or control
of the license for a period of at least [5] 3 years following licensure.

HOUSE BILL 1519
(2) The [5–year] 3–YEAR period specified in paragraph (1) of this
subsection does not include the time period that a business is considered by the
Administration to be in a preapproved licensure status.
(3) The limitations under this subsection do not apply to:
(i) transfers as a result of the disability, incapacity, or death of the
owner of a cannabis license, bankruptcy or receivership in accordance with a lending
agreement of a cannabis licensee, or court order; or
(ii) the sale of a cannabis licensee to the licensee’s employees
through an employee stock ownership plan as defined in § 407(d)(6)(A) of the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
(4) The limitations under this subsection do not apply to a transfer of
ownership that is the subject of a legally binding settlement agreement resulting from
litigation commenced on or before January 1, 2023.
36–803.
[The] ON OR BEFORE THE 10TH DAY OF EACH MONTH, THE Administration shall
publish the following data, organized by month, [on a rolling basis and] on a publicly
accessible part of the Administration’s website:
(1) the number of patients, caregivers, and providers certified under this
title;
(2) the wholesale and retail sales of medical and adult–use cannabis,
measured by revenue and volume; and
(3) the median consumer price for cannabis and cannabis products.
36–901.
(a) In this subtitle[, “advertisement”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ADVERTISEMENT” means the publication, dissemination, or
circulation of any auditory, visual, digital, oral, or written matter, which is directly or
indirectly calculated to induce the sale of cannabis or any cannabis–related product or
service.
[(b)] (2) “Advertisement” does not include packaging or labeling.

HOUSE BILL 1519 7
(C) “THERAPEUTIC OR MEDICAL CLAIM” MEANS A CLAIM THAT EXPLICITLY
STATES A PRODUCT CAN DIAGNOSE, TREAT, MITIGATE, CURE, OR PREVENT A
DISEASE OR CONDITION.
36–902.
An advertisement for cannabis and cannabis products or cannabis–related services
that makes therapeutic or medical claims shall:
(1) be supported by competent and reliable scientific evidence; and
(2) include information on the most serious and most common side effects
or risks associated with the use of cannabis.
36–903.
(a) (1) An advertisement for a cannabis licensee, cannabis product, or
cannabis–related service may not:
(i) violate Title 13, Subtitle 3 of the Commercial Law Article;
(ii) directly [or indirectly] target individuals under the age of 21
years;
(iii) contain a design, an illustration, a picture, or a representation
that:
1. targets [or is attractive to] minors, including a cartoon
character, a mascot, or any other depiction that is commonly used to market products to
minors;
2. displays the use of cannabis, including the consumption,
smoking, or vaping of cannabis;
3. encourages or promotes cannabis for use as an intoxicant;
or
4. is obscene; OR
(iv) engage in advertising by means of television, radio, Internet,
mobile application, social media, or other electronic communication, event sponsorship, or
print publication, unless at least 85% of the audience is reasonably expected to be at least
21 years old as determined by reliable and current audience composition data[; or
(v) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, engage in
advertising by means of placing an advertisement on the side of a building or another

HOUSE BILL 1519
publicly visible location of any form, including a sign, a poster, a placard, a device, a graphic
display, an outdoor billboard, or a freestanding signboard].
(2) [A] SUBJECT TO THE PROHIBITIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I)
THROUGH (III) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A cannabis business may [place exterior signage]
PUBLICLY DISPLAY AN ADVERTISEMENT, INCLUDING A SIGN, A POSTER, A GRAPHIC
DISPLAY, AN OUTDOOR BILLBOARD, OR A FREESTANDING SIGNBOARD:
(I) on the premises of the business [for the limited purpose of
identifying the business to the public]; OR
(II) AT ANY OTHER LOCATION THAT IS NOT WITHIN 500 FEET OF:
1. A PRIMARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL;
2. A LICENSED CHILD CARE CENTER OR A REGISTERED
FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME UNDER TITLE 9.5 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE;
3. A PLAYGROUND, RECREATION CENTER, LIBRARY, OR
PUBLIC PARK;
4. A PLACE OF WORSHIP; OR
5. A FACILITY THAT PROVIDES SUBSTANCE USE
TREATMENT.
(b) (1) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, each
cannabis–related website shall employ a neutral age–screening mechanism that verifies
that the user is at least 21 years old, including by using an age–gate, age–screen, or age
verification mechanism before the user may access or view any content and before the
website may collect the user’s address, e–mail address, phone number, or contact
information to disseminate advertisements.
(ii) If a website is appropriate for a qualifying patient who is under
the age of 21 years, the website shall provide an alternative screening mechanism for the
qualifying patient.
(2) An advertisement placed on social media or a mobile application shall
include a notification that an individual must be at least 21 years old to view the content.
(3) The provisions of this subtitle applicable to cannabis licensees may not
be avoided by hiring or contracting with a third party, or outsourcing advertisements that
do not comply with this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1519 9
(4) (I) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A cannabis licensee may not allow the use of the licensee’s trademarks,
brands, names, locations, or other distinguishing characteristics for third–party use for
advertisements that do not comply with this subtitle.
(II) THE USE OF TRADEMARKS, BRANDS, NAMES, LOCATIONS,
OR OTHER DISTINGUISHING CHARACTERISTICS IN A NEWS ARTICLE, INTERVIEW,
DOCUMENTARY, OR OTHER EDITORIAL CONTENT THAT IS NOT INTENDED AS
COMMERCIAL ADVERTISING IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE PROHIBITION UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(5) (I) A CANNABIS LICENSEE MAY SUBMIT, IN A FORM
PRESCRIBED BY THE ADMINISTRATION, AN ADVERTISEMENT TO THE
ADMINISTRATION FOR AN ADVISORY OPINION ON WHETHER THE ADVERTISEMENT
COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING AN ADVERTISEMENT
SUBMITTED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL REVIEW THE ADVERTISEMENT AND PROVIDE THE
LICENSEE WITH THE ADVISORY OPINION.
(c) The Administration shall adopt regulations to establish procedures for the
enforcement of this section.
36–1102.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Hemp” has the meaning stated in § 14–401 of the Agriculture Article.
(3) “Tetrahydrocannabinol” means:
(i) any tetrahydrocannabinol, including
delta–8–tetrahydrocannabinol, delta–9–tetrahydrocannabinol, and
delta–10–tetrahydrocannabinol, regardless of how derived;
(ii) any other cannabinoid, except cannabidiol that the
Administration determines to cause intoxication; and
(iii) any other chemically similar compound, substance, derivative, or
isomer of tetrahydrocannabinol, as identified by the Administration.
(4) “Tincture” means a solution that is:
(i) dissolved in alcohol, glycerin, or vegetable oil; and

HOUSE BILL 1519
(ii) distributed in a dropper bottle of 4 ounces or less.
(b) (1) A person may not sell or distribute a product intended for human
consumption or inhalation that contains more than 0.5 milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol
per serving or 2.5 milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol per package unless the person is
licensed under § 36–401 of this title and the product complies with the:
(i) manufacturing standards established under § 36–203 of this
title;
(ii) laboratory testing standards established under § 36–203 of this
title; and
(iii) packaging and labeling standards established under § 36–203 of
this title.
(2) A person may not sell or distribute a product described under
paragraph (1) of this subsection to an individual under the age of 21 years.
(c) A person may not sell or distribute a cannabinoid product that is not derived
from naturally occurring biologically active chemical constituents.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section and subject to paragraph
(2) of this subsection, it is not a violation of this section for a person to sell or distribute a
hemp–derived tincture intended for human consumption that contains:
(i) a ratio of cannabidiol to tetrahydrocannabinol of at least 15 to 1;
and
(ii) 2.5 milligrams or less of tetrahydrocannabinol per serving and
100 milligrams or less of tetrahydrocannabinol per package.
(2) To sell or distribute a hemp–derived tincture under this subsection, a
person must provide, as required by the Administration, tincture samples for the purpose
of testing to determine chemical potency and composition levels and to detect and quantify
contaminants.
(e) A person who violates subsection (b) of this section:
(1) may be charged by a citation; and
(2) is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine not
exceeding [$5,000] $10,000.
(f) A person who violates subsection (c) of this section:
(1) may be charged by a citation; and

HOUSE BILL 1519 11
(2) is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine not
exceeding $10,000.
(G) EACH INDIVIDUALLY PACKAGED PRODUCT THAT IS SOLD OR
DISTRIBUTED BY A PERSON IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OR (C) OF THIS
SECTION IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Cannabis
Administration shall adopt regulations to implement this Act on or before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.